Washington statutes.
RCW 19.225.060

Form of contract.

(1) An agency contract must be in a record signed by the parties.

(2) An agency contract must contain:

(a) The amount and method of calculating the consideration to be paid by the student athlete for services to be provided by the athlete agent under the contract and any other consideration the athlete agent has received or will receive from any other source for entering into the contract or for providing the services;

(b) The name of any person other than the athlete agent who will be compensated because the student athlete signed the contract;

(c) A description of any expenses the student athlete agrees to reimburse;

(d) A description of the services to be provided to the athlete;

(e) The duration of the contract; and

(f) The date of execution.

(3) Subject to subsection (7) of this section, an agency contract must contain a conspicuous notice in boldface type and in substantially the following form:

WARNING TO STUDENT ATHLETE

IF YOU SIGN THIS CONTRACT:

(a) YOU MAY LOSE YOUR ELIGIBILITY TO COMPETE AS A STUDENT ATHLETE IN YOUR SPORT;

(b) BOTH YOU AND YOUR ATHLETE AGENT MUST NOTIFY YOUR ATHLETIC DIRECTOR, IF YOU HAVE AN ATHLETIC DIRECTOR, AT LEAST SEVENTY-TWO HOURS PRIOR TO ENTERING INTO AN AGENCY CONTRACT THAT YOU INTEND TO ENTER INTO THIS CONTRACT AND PROVIDE THE NAME AND CONTACT INFORMATION OF THE ATHLETE AGENT AND AGAIN WITHIN SEVENTY-TWO HOURS AFTER ENTERING INTO AN AGENCY CONTRACT THAT YOU HAVE ENTERED INTO THIS CONTRACT AND PROVIDE THE NAME AND CONTACT INFORMATION OF THE ATHLETE AGENT; AND

(c) YOU MAY CANCEL THIS CONTRACT WITHIN 14 DAYS AFTER SIGNING IT. CANCELLATION OF THIS CONTRACT MAY NOT REINSTATE YOUR ELIGIBILITY AS A STUDENT ATHLETE IN YOUR SPORT.

(4) An agency contract must be accompanied by a separate record signed by the student athlete or, if the athlete is a minor, the parent or guardian of the athlete acknowledging that signing the contract may result in the loss of the athlete's eligibility to participate in the athlete's sport.

(5) A student athlete or, if the athlete is a minor, the parent or guardian of the athlete may void an agency contract that does not conform to this section. If the contract is voided, any consideration received from the athlete agent under the contract to induce entering into the contract is not required to be returned.

(6) At the time an agency contract is executed, the athlete agent shall give the student athlete or, if the athlete is a minor, the parent or guardian of the athlete a copy in a record of the contract and the separate acknowledgment required in subsection (4) of this section.

(7) If a student athlete is a minor, an agency contract must be signed by the parent or guardian of the minor and the notice required by subsection (3) of this section must be revised accordingly.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 13 s 6; 2002 c 131 s 7.]